District of Columbia statutes.
2-223.06

Posting of notice.

District instrumentalities shall conspicuously display notices of employee protections and obligations under this subchapter in each personnel office and in other public places, and shall use all other appropriate means to keep all employees informed, including but not limited to the inclusion of annual notices of employee protections and obligations under this subchapter with employee tax reporting documents. District government contractors shall inform all employees engaged in performing District government contracts of their rights under this subchapter. A person who or entity that employs security officers shall inform those employees of their rights under this subchapter.

History

Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 207, 45 DCR 5147
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-187, § 201(d), 53 DCR 6722

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1177.6.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-187 added the sentence: “A person who or entity that employs security officers shall inform those employees of their rights under this subchapter.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 2-223.01.